Washington statutes.
RCW 11.98.150

Distribution of assets after one hundred fifty-year period.

If, at the end of the one hundred fifty years following the effective date of an instrument creating a trust, any of the trust assets have not by the terms of the trust instrument become distributable or vested, then the assets shall be distributed as the superior court having jurisdiction directs, giving effect to the general intent of the creator of the trust or person exercising a power of appointment in the case of any further trust or other disposition of property made pursuant to the exercise of a power of appointment.

[ 2001 c 60 s 3; 1985 c 30 s 57. Prior: 1984 c 149 s 89; 1965 c 145 s 11.98.030; prior: 1959 c 146 s 3. Formerly RCW 11.98.030.]

NOTES:

Application—2001 c 60: See note following RCW 11.98.130.

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.

Severability—Effective dates—1984 c 149: See notes following RCW 11.02.005.